Missouri, session 2026, SB1106.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 442, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 442.700, to read as
follows:
442.700. 1. For purposes of this section, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Foreign corporation":
(a) An investment vehicle that:
a. Consists of not more than one hundred fifty private
investors;
b. Is not required to register as an investment
company with the United States Securities and Exchange
Commission;
c. Has fifty million dollars or more in net value or
assets under management on any day during any taxable year;
and
d. Has a primary place of business located outside of
the state of Missouri;
(b) The term "foreign corporation" shall not include
any bank or other entity incorporated in this state subject

SB 1106 2
to chartering, licensing, or regulation by the Missouri
division of finance;
(2) "Residential real estate", real property improved
by a structure that is used or intended to be used for
residential living by human occupants containing not more
than four dwelling units.
2. Beginning August 28, 2026, a foreign corporation or
any affiliate or subsidiary thereof shall not acquire,
directly or indirectly, any residential real estate in this
state. The attorney general may bring a cause of action in
any circuit court with proper jurisdiction if the attorney
general has reason to believe that a foreign corporation or
any affiliate or subsidiary thereof has acquired, directly
or indirectly, any residential real estate in this state on
or after August 28, 2026. If the court finds that
residential real estate has been acquired in violation of
this section, the court shall order the sale of the
residential real estate not later than ninety days after the
order.
✓